Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3321
Legal service insurance corporation; agency or management contract; director approval required.

A corporation organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 shall not enter into an exclusive agency contract or management contract, unless the contract is first filed with the director and approved within thirty days of filing or such reasonable extended period as the director may specify by notice given within thirty days. The director may disapprove the contracts submitted if he or she finds that the contract contains provisions which impair the interests of the insurer's participants, creditors, or the public in this state.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 21.